devtools/testdata/inspect/samisuffix.regex
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
[
    [i b i e] (->) [   e b e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i d i e] (->) [   e d e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e d e]   (->) [ i d i e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e g e]   (->) [ e h k e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i s n e] (->) [ i s n i e "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e s i]   (->) [ a s s e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [a s s i] (->) [ a s s e   "<CORR>"]::30 
    || _ .#.
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ];
